Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-239
School lands; lease; default; extensions; when granted; conditions; lien.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds may extend the time of payment of delinquent interest or rental when it deems it to be in the best interest of the state, and it has full assurance that such delinquent interest or rental will be paid. Such extensions shall be granted, upon proper application to the board, and then only to the record owner of the lease who actually uses or occupies educational lands, for periods of one year, and shall bear interest the same as other delinquent rentals, and shall be upon condition the lease is assigned to the state as part assurance of payment. In the event the movable improvements on the land do not constitute sufficient security to justify an extension of time, the lessee may give a lien to the state on the growing crops thereon, if any.

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 12, p. 605;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-219;

R.S.1943, § 72-239;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 31.

School lands are subject to an annual rental of six percent of the appraised value. State v. Platte Valley P. P. & I. Dist., 147 Neb. 289, 23 N.W.2d 300 (1946).

Under prior law at the expiration of a lease on school lands executed prior to July 9, 1897, the only advantage afforded such lessee is the right to obtain a renewal free from competition and at the previous rental rate. Stanser v. Cather, 85 Neb. 305, 123 N.W. 316 (1909), rehearing denied 85 Neb. 313, 124 N.W. 102 (1909).